Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2711
Department; enforcement; rules and regulations.

The department shall have full authority to enforce sections 2-2701 to 2-2711 both by denial of a permit to sell tractors in the state and by injunctive relief in the district court having jurisdiction. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to enforce the intent and purposes of such sections.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 46, p. 1398;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-346;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 11, p. 1490;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 14.